src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v43_odd_jatkata_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - jatkata - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     jatkata+V+Inf: jatkata
     jatkata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jatkaan
     jatkata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: jatkaat
     jatkata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jatkaa
     jatkata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: jatkaama
     jatkata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: jatkaatta
     jatkata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jatkathaan
     jatkata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: jatkasin
     jatkata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: jatkasit
     jatkata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [jatkas, jatkasi] 
     jatkata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: jatkasimma
     jatkata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: jatkasitta
     jatkata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: jatkathiin
     jatkata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: jatkanu
     jatkata+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: jatkattu
     jatkata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: jatkanheet
     jatkata+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: jatkaava
     jatkata+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: jatkaavat
     jatkata+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: jatkattava
     jatkata+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: jatkattavat

     jatkata+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: jatkaisin
     jatkata+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: jatkaisit
     jatkata+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: jatkais
     jatkata+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: jatkaisimma
     jatkata+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: jatkaisitta
     jatkata+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: jatkattais
     jatkata+V+Pass+Cond: jatkattais

     jatkata+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: jatkaa
     jatkata+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: jatkakkaa

     jatkata+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: jatkaamassa
     jatkata+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: jatkaamasta
     jatkata+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: jatkaamhaan
     jatkata+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: jatkaamalla
     jatkata+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: jatkaamatta
